Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-826.02
Proposed bridge or culvert; natural resources district; dam; feasibility study.

If a natural resources district shall receive notice of a proposed bridge or culvert pursuant to section 39-826.01, the district shall make a study to determine whether it would be practicable to construct a dam at or near the proposed site which could be used to support a highway or road. In making the study, such district shall consider the benefit which would be derived and the feasibility of such a dam. After it has made its determination, the natural resources district shall notify the Department of Transportation or the county board and shall, if the district favors such a dam, assist in the joint feasibility study and provide any other assistance which may be required.

Laws 1979, LB 213, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 113.